Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.430

Homeowner recovery program—Reports.

(1) By December 1st of each year through 2034, the department must submit an annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, on the homeowner recovery program under RCW 18.27.410, including the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(a) The applications made under the program, including data as to claim amounts;

(b) The payments made under the program;

(c) The status of any waitlist;

(d) The status and solvency of the homeowner recovery account under RCW 18.27.420; and

(e) Recommendations for any changes to the program, if deemed necessary by the department.

(2) By December 1, 2035, and each year thereafter, the department shall notify the appropriate committees of the legislature, by submitting a report in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, if the department finds there is a significant waitlist of eligible applicants or otherwise finds there is insufficient funds in the homeowner recovery account to sustain the homeowner recovery program.

[ 2023 c 213 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 213 ss 3-9: See note following RCW 18.27.040.